Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.090

Hearing on liability of owner for costs or charges—Review.

Any person upon request and pursuant to the rules and regulations of the horticultural pest and disease board shall be entitled to a hearing before the board on any charge or cost for which such person is alleged to be liable under subsection (2) of RCW 15.09.080. Any determination or final action by the board shall be subject to judicial review by a proceeding in the superior court of the county where the property is situated and to any damages suffered on account of disinfection work wrongfully undertaken, but no stay or injunction shall lie to delay any such disinfection work subsequent to notice given pursuant to RCW 15.09.080.

[ 1969 c 113 s 9.]